District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

44-2010

Duration, modification, sale, or transfer of a certificate of need.

Repealed.

Mar. 16, 1993, D.C. Law 9-197, § 11, 39 DCR 9195
Sept. 26, 1995, D.C. Law 11-52, § 808, 42 DCR 3684
1981 Ed., § 32-330.
See notes following § 44-2001.